California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) In order to increase the quality of community services and protect consumers, the regional center shall, if appropriate, take either of the following actions:

(1) Identify services and supports that are ineffective or of poor quality and provide or secure consultation, training, or technical assistance services for an agency or individual provider to assist that agency or individual provider in upgrading the quality of services or supports.

(2) Identify providers of services or supports that may not be in compliance with local, state, and federal statutes and regulations and notify the appropriate licensing or regulatory authority to investigate the possible noncompliance.

(e) If necessary to expand the availability of needed services of good quality, a regional center may take actions that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Soliciting an individual or agency by requests for proposals or other means, to provide needed services or supports not presently available.

(2) Requesting funds from the Program Development Fund, pursuant to Section 4677, or community resource development plan funds designated from that fund, to reimburse the startup costs needed to initiate a new program of services and
 supports, including, but not limited to, mental health services and supports, supported living services, family home agencies, family teaching homes, and independent living services.

(3) Using creative and innovative service delivery models, including, but not limited to, natural supports.

(f) Except in emergency situations, a regional center shall not provide direct treatment and therapeutic services, but shall utilize appropriate public and private community agencies and service providers to obtain those services for its consumers.

(g) If there are identified gaps in the system of services and supports consumers for whom no provider will provide services and supports contained in their individual program plan, the department may provide the services and supports
 directly.

(h) At least annually, regional centers shall provide the consumer, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative a statement of services and supports the regional center purchased for the purpose of ensuring that they are delivered. The statement shall include the type, unit, month, and cost of services and supports purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 5.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.1.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services and regional centers may monitor services and supports purchased for regional center consumers with or without prior notice. Not less than two monitoring visits to a licensed long-term health care or community care facility or family home agency home each year shall be unannounced. The department may conduct fiscal reviews and audits of the service providers’ records.

(b) Department and regional center staff involved in monitoring or auditing services provided to the regional centers’ consumers by a service provider shall have access to the provider’s grounds, buildings, and service program, and to all related records, including books, papers, computerized data, accounting records, and related documentation. All persons connected with the service provider’s program, including, but not limited to, program administrators, staff, consultants, and accountants, shall provide information and access to facilities as required by the department or regional center.

(c) The department, in cooperation with regional centers, shall ensure that all providers of services and supports purchased by regional centers for their consumers are informed of all of the following:

(1) The provisions of this section.

(2) The responsibility of providers to comply with laws and regulations governing both their service program and the provision of services and supports to people with developmental disabilities.

(3) The responsibility of providers to comply with conditions of any contract or agreement between the regional center and the provider, and between the provider and the department.

(4) The rights of providers established in regulations adopted pursuant to Sections 4648.2, 4748, and 4780.5, to appeal actions taken by regional centers or the department as a result of their monitoring and auditing findings.

(d) A regional center may terminate payments for services, and may terminate its contract or authorization for the purchase of consumer services if it determines that the provider has not complied with provisions of its contract or authorization with the regional center or with applicable state laws and regulations. When terminating payments for services or its contract or authorization for the purchase of consumer services, a regional center shall make reasonable efforts to avoid unnecessary disruptions of consumer services.

(e) A regional center or the department may recover from the provider funds paid for services when the department or the regional center determines that either of the following has occurred:

(1) The services were not provided in accordance with the regional center’s contract or authorization with the provider, or with applicable state laws or regulations.

(2) The rate paid is based on inaccurate data submitted by the provider on a provider cost statement.

Any funds so recovered shall be remitted to the department.

(f) Any evidence of suspected licensing violations found by department or regional center personnel shall be reported immediately to the appropriate state licensing agency.

(g) Regional centers may establish volunteer teams, made up of consumers, parents, other family members, and advocates to conduct the monitoring activities described in this section.

(h) In meeting its responsibility to provide technical assistance to providers of community living arrangements for persons with developmental disabilities, including, but not limited to, licensed residential facilities, family home agencies, and supported or independent living arrangements, a regional center shall utilize the “Looking at Service Quality-Provider’s Handbook” developed by the department or subsequent revisions developed by the department.

(i) Effective July 1, 2009, a regional center shall not be required to perform triennial evaluations of community care facilities, as described in Sections 56046, 56049, 56050, 56051, and 56052 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 11.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.11.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a request for proposals that is prepared by a regional center for consumer services and supports shall include a section on issues of equity and diversity.

(2) The section on equity and
 diversity shall request, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A statement outlining the applicant’s plan to serve diverse populations, including, but not limited to, culturally and linguistically diverse populations.

(B) Examples of the applicant’s commitment
 to addressing the
 needs of those diverse populations.

(C) Any additional information that the applicant deems relevant to issues of equity and diversity.

(b) A request for proposals that applies only to specifically identified consumers is required only to request information on how the applicant plans to provide culturally and linguistically competent services and supports to those specific consumers.

(c) This section shall not alter contracts entered into before January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   (SB 208)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.12.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that under federal and state law, certain individuals and entities are ineligible to provide Medicaid services.

(b) An individual, partnership, group association, corporation, institution, or entity, and the officers, directors, owners, managing employees, or agents thereof, that has been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor involving fraud or abuse in any government program, or related to neglect or abuse of an elder or dependent adult or child, or in connection with the interference with, or obstruction of, any investigation into health care related fraud or abuse, or that has been found liable for fraud or abuse in any civil proceeding, or that has entered
 into a settlement in lieu of conviction for fraud or abuse in any government program, within the previous 10 years, shall be ineligible to be a regional center vendor. The regional center shall not deny vendorization to an otherwise qualified applicant whose felony or misdemeanor charges did not result in a conviction solely on the basis of the prior charges.

(c) In order to ensure compliance with federal disclosure requirements and to preserve federal funding of consumer services, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Adopt emergency regulations to amend provider and vendor eligibility and disclosure criteria to meet federal participation requirements. These emergency regulations shall address, at a minimum, disclosure requirements of current and prospective vendors, including information about entity ownership and control, contracting
 interests, and criminal convictions or civil proceedings involving fraud or abuse in any government program, or abuse or neglect of an elder, dependent adult, or child.

(B) Adopt emergency regulations to meet federal requirements applicable to vouchered services.

(C) The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this paragraph is deemed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.9 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from that requirement. For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the 120-day period, as applicable to the effective period of an emergency regulatory action and submission of specified materials to the Office of Administrative Law, is hereby extended to 180 days.

(2) Adopt nonemergency regulations to implement the terms of paragraph (1) through the regular rulemaking process pursuant to Sections 11346 and 11349.1 of the Government Code within 18 months of the adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 11.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.13.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Probability sample or sampling” means a standard statistical methodology by which a sample is selected based on the mathematical theory of probability regarding the occurrence of random events.

(2) “Statistical extrapolation” means the methodology whereby an unknown value can be estimated by projecting the results of a probability sample to the universe from which the sample was drawn with a calculated precision.

(b) The State Department of Developmental Services and regional centers may utilize probability sampling and statistical
 extrapolation when conducting fiscal audits of service providers.

(c) Probability sampling shall be done using methodologies that are well-accepted by statisticians.

(d) Whenever the results of a probability sample are extrapolated, the audit report shall include a clear description of all the following:

(1) The universe from which the sample was drawn.

(2) The sample size and method used to select the sample.

(3) The formulas and calculation procedures used to determine the dollar amount at issue.

(4) The confidence level associated with the precision of the extrapolation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 8.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.14.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Public Health shall notify the State Department of Developmental Services of any administrative action initiated against a licensee serving consumers with developmental disabilities. For the purposes of this section “administrative action” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The issuance of a citation requiring corrective action for a health and safety violation.

(b) The temporary or other suspension or revocation of a license.

(c) The issuance of a temporary
 restraining order.

(d) The appointment of a temporary receiver pursuant to Section 1327 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 12.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.2.

By September 1, 1986, the State Department of Developmental Services shall promulgate regulations which establish a process for service providers to appeal actions the department takes as a result of its auditing and monitoring activities. To the extent possible, this process shall include procedures contained in fiscal audit appeals regulations established pursuant to Section 4780.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 873, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.3.

A provider of transportation services to regional center clients for the regional center shall maintain protection against liability for damages for bodily injuries or death and for damage to or destruction of property, which may be incurred by the provider in the course of providing those services. The protection shall be maintained at the level established by the regional center to which the transportation services are provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 492, Sec. 3.   Effective September 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.35.

At the time of development, review, or modification of a consumer’s individual program plan (IPP) or individualized family service plan (IFSP), all of the following shall apply to a regional center:

(a) A regional center shall not fund private specialized transportation services for an adult consumer who can safely access and utilize public transportation, when that transportation is available.

(b) A regional center shall fund the least expensive transportation modality that meets the consumer’s needs, as set forth in the consumer’s IPP or IFSP.

(c) A regional center shall
 fund transportation, when required, from the consumer’s residence to the lowest-cost vendor that provides the service that meets the consumer’s needs, as set forth in the consumer’s IPP or IFSP. For purposes of this subdivision, the cost of a vendor shall be determined by combining the vendor’s program costs and the costs to transport a consumer from the consumer’s residence to the vendor.

(d) A regional center shall fund transportation services for a minor child living in the family residence, only if the family of the child provides sufficient written documentation to the regional center to demonstrate that it is unable to provide transportation for the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 12.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2006, rates for services listed in paragraphs (1), (2), with the exception of travel reimbursement, (3) to (8), inclusive, (10), and (11) of subdivision (b), shall be increased by 3 percent, subject to funds specifically appropriated for this increase in the Budget Act of 2006. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers. Any subsequent change shall be governed by subdivision (b).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, except for subdivision (a), no regional center may pay any provider of the following services or supports a rate that is greater than the rate that is in effect on or after June 30, 2008, unless the increase is required by a contract between the regional center and the vendor that is in effect on June 30, 2008, or the regional center demonstrates that the approval is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety and the department has granted prior written authorization:

(1) Supported living services.

(2) Transportation, including travel reimbursement.

(3) Socialization training programs.

(4) Behavior intervention training.

(5) Community integration training programs.

(6) Community activities support services.

(7) Mobile day programs.

(8) Creative art programs.

(9) Supplemental day services program supports.

(10) Adaptive skills trainers.

(11) Independent living specialists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 4.   Effective February 16, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.55.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a regional center shall not purchase day program, vocational education, work services, independent living program, or mobility training and related transportation services for a consumer who is 18 to 22 years of age, inclusive, if that consumer is eligible for special education and related education services and has not received a diploma or certificate of completion, unless the individual program plan (IPP) planning team determines that the consumer’s needs cannot be met in the educational system or grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (d). If the planning team determines that generic services can meet the consumer’s day, vocational education, work services, independent living, or mobility training and related transportation needs, the regional center shall assist the consumer
 in accessing those services. To ensure that consumers receive appropriate educational services and an effective transition from services provided by educational agencies to services provided by regional centers, the regional center service coordinator, at the request of the consumer or, where appropriate, the consumer’s parent, legal guardian, or conservator, may attend the individualized education program (IEP) planning team meeting.

(b) For consumers who are 18 to 22 years of age, inclusive, who have left the public school system, and who are receiving regional center purchased services identified in subdivision (a) on or before the effective date of this section, a determination shall be made through the IPP as to whether the return to the educational system can be achieved while meeting the consumer’s needs. If the planning team determines that the consumer’s needs cannot be met in the educational system, the regional center may continue to
 purchase the services identified in subdivision (a). If the planning team determines that generic services can meet the consumer’s day, vocational education, work services, independent living, or mobility training and related transportation needs, the regional center shall assist the consumer in accessing those services.

(c) For consumers who are 18 to 22 years of age, inclusive, who have left school prior to enactment of this section, but who are not receiving any of the regional center purchased services identified in subdivision (a), the regional center shall use generic education services to meet the consumer’s day, vocational education, work services, independent living, or mobility training and related transportation needs if those needs are subsequently identified in the IPP unless the consumer is eligible for an exemption as set forth in subdivision (d). If the planning team determines that generic services can meet the consumer’s day,
 vocational education, work services, independent living, or mobility training and related transportation needs, the regional center shall assist the consumer in accessing those services.

(d) An exemption to the provisions of this section may be granted in either of the following circumstances:

(1) For participation in a paid internship or competitive integrated employment that is an outcome of a paid internship described in subdivision (a) of Section 4870 if the IPP planning team determines that the consumer could benefit from participation in a paid internship or competitive integrated employment. Participation in a paid internship or competitive integrated employment that is an outcome of a paid internship does not preclude a consumer from continuing to receive public education services to the extent those services are determined to continue to meet the consumer’s needs.

(2) On an individual basis in extraordinary circumstances to permit purchase of a service identified in subdivision (a). An exemption shall be granted through the IPP process and shall be based on a determination that the generic service is not appropriate to meet the consumer’s need. The consumer shall be informed of the exemption and the process for obtaining an exemption.

(e) A school district may contract with regional center vendors to meet the needs of consumers pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 18, Sec. 13.   (AB 107)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4648.6.

The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall develop an alternative service delivery model that provides an Individual Choice Budget for obtaining quality services and supports which provides choice and flexibility within a finite budget that in the aggregate reduces regional center purchase of service expenditures, reduces reliance on the state general fund, and maximizes federal financial participation in the delivery of services. The individual budget will be determined using a fair, equitable, transparent standardized process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4649.

Regional centers shall cooperate with the state council in joint efforts to inform the public of services available to persons with developmental disabilities and of their unmet needs, provide materials and education programs to community groups and agencies with interest in, or responsibility for, persons with developmental disabilities, and develop resource materials, if necessary, containing information about local agencies, facilities, and service providers offering services to persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 47.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4650.

Regional centers shall be responsible for developing an annual plan and program budget to be submitted to the director no later than September 1 of each fiscal year. An information copy shall be submitted to the state council by the same date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 48.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that regional centers shall find innovative and economical methods of achieving the objectives contained in individual program plans of persons with developmental disabilities.

(b) The department shall encourage and assist regional centers to use innovative programs, techniques, and staffing arrangements to carry out their responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1011, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

A regional center shall investigate every appropriate and economically feasible alternative for care of a developmentally disabled person available within the region. If suitable care cannot be found within the region, services may be obtained outside of the region.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.5.

(a) (1) An entity that receives payments from one or more regional centers shall contract with an independent accounting firm to obtain an independent audit or independent review report of its financial statements relating to payments made by regional centers, subject to both of the following:

(A) If the amount received from the regional center or regional centers during each state fiscal year is more than or equal to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), but less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the entity shall obtain an independent review report of its financial statements for the entity’s fiscal year that includes the last day of the most recent state fiscal year. Consistent with Subchapter 21 (commencing with Section 58800) of
 Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, this subdivision shall also apply to work activity program providers receiving less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(B) If the amount received from the regional center or regional centers during each state fiscal year is equal to or more than two million dollars ($2,000,000), the entity shall obtain an independent audit of its financial statements for the entity’s fiscal year that includes the last day of the most recent state fiscal year.

(2) This requirement does not apply to payments made using usual and customary rates, as defined by Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, for services provided by regional centers.

(3) This requirement does not apply to state and local governmental agencies, the University of
 California, or the California State University.

(b) An entity subject to subdivision (a) shall provide copies of the independent audit or independent review report required by subdivision (a), and accompanying management letters, to the vendoring regional center within nine months of the end of the entity’s fiscal year.

(c) Regional centers that receive the audit or review reports required by subdivision (b) shall review and require resolution by the entity for issues identified in the report that have an impact on regional center services. Regional centers shall take appropriate action, up to termination of vendorization, for lack of adequate resolution of issues.

(d) (1) Regional centers shall notify the department of all qualified opinion reports or reports noting significant issues that
 directly or indirectly impact regional center services within 30 days after receipt. Notification shall include a plan for resolution of issues.

(2) A regional center shall submit copies of all independent audit reports that it receives to the department for review. The department shall compile data, by regional center, on vendor compliance with audit requirements and opinions resulting from audit reports and shall annually publish the data in the performance dashboard developed pursuant to Section 4572.

(e) For purposes of this section, an independent review of financial statements shall be performed by an independent accounting firm and shall cover, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) An inquiry as to the entity’s accounting principles and practices and methods used in applying them.

(2) An inquiry as to the entity’s procedures for recording, classifying, and summarizing transactions and accumulating information.

(3) Analytical procedures designed to identify relationships or items that appear to be unusual.

(4) An inquiry about budgetary actions taken at meetings of the board of directors or other comparable meetings.

(5) An inquiry about whether the financial statements have been properly prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and whether any events subsequent to the date of the financial statements would have a material effect on the statements under review.

(6) Working papers prepared in connection with a review of financial statements
 describing the items covered as well as any unusual items, including their disposition.

(f) For purposes of this section, an independent review report shall cover, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Certification that the review was performed in accordance with standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

(2) Certification that the statements are the representations of management.

(3) Certification that the review consisted of inquiries and analytical procedures that are lesser in scope than those of an audit.

(4) Certification that the accountant is not aware of any material modifications that need to be made to the statements for them to be in
 conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(g) The department shall not consider a request for adjustments to rates submitted in accordance with Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations by an entity receiving payments from one or more regional centers solely to fund either anticipated or unanticipated changes required to comply with this section.

(h) (1) An entity required to obtain an independent review report of its financial statements pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may apply to the regional center for, and the regional center shall grant, a two-year exemption from the independent review report requirement if the regional center does not find issues in the prior year’s independent review report that have an impact on regional center services.

(2) An entity required to obtain an independent audit of its financial statements pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may apply to the regional center for an exemption from the independent audit requirement, subject to both of the following conditions:

(A) If the independent audit for the prior year resulted in an unmodified opinion or an unmodified opinion with additional communication, the regional center shall grant the entity a two-year exemption.

(B) If the independent audit for the prior year resulted in a qualified opinion and the issues are not material, the regional center shall grant the entity a two-year exemption. The entity and the regional center shall continue to address issues raised in this independent audit, regardless of whether the exemption is granted.

(3) A regional center shall annually report to the department any exemptions granted pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 429, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 269.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4653.

Except for those developmentally disabled persons judicially committed to state hospitals, no developmentally disabled person shall be admitted to a state hospital except upon the referral of a regional center. Upon discharge from a state hospital, a developmentally disabled person shall be referred to an appropriate regional center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4654.

Before any person is examined by a regional center pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code, the court ordering such medical examination shall transmit to the regional center a copy of the orders made pursuant to proceedings conducted under Sections 1368 and 1369 of the Penal Code. The purpose of the mental examination shall be to determine if developmental disability is the primary diagnosis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4655.

The director of a regional center or his designee may give consent to medical, dental, and surgical treatment of a regional center client and provide for such treatment to be given to the person under the following conditions:

(a) If the developmentally disabled person’s parent, guardian, or conservator legally authorized to consent to such treatment does not respond within a reasonable time to the request of the director or his designee for the granting or denying of consent for such treatment, the director of a regional center or his designee may consent on behalf of the developmentally disabled person to such treatment and provide for such treatment to be given to such person.

(b) If the developmentally disabled person has no parent, guardian, or conservator legally authorized to consent to medical, dental, or surgical treatment on behalf of the person, the director of the regional center or his designee may consent to such treatment on behalf of the person and provide for such treatment to be given to the person. The director of a regional center or his designee may thereupon also initiate, or cause to be initiated, proceedings for the appointment of a guardian or conservator legally authorized to consent to medical, dental, or surgical services.

(c) If the developmentally disabled person is an adult and has no conservator, consent to treatment may be given by someone other than the person on the person’s behalf only if the developmentally disabled person is mentally incapable of giving his own consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

4656.

(a) A qualified physician and surgeon who diagnoses a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512, of a patient who is a minor shall attempt to determine from the patient, the parents or guardian of the patient, or the regional center for the area whether the person has been previously referred to the regional center for the area. If the patient has not been previously referred to the regional center, the physician and surgeon shall inform a parent or the guardian of the patient of the existence of the regional center for the area, its address and telephone number, and shall describe to the person the services available through the regional center, and shall, upon request of the parent or guardian of the patient, refer in writing the patient through his or her parent or guardian to the regional center. Upon obtaining the consent of the patient’s parent or guardian, the physician and surgeon shall notify the regional center of the referral.

For the purposes of this section, “qualified physician and surgeon” means those physicians and surgeons who have recognized and accredited training and a specialized pediatric practice in childhood disabilities.

(b) Each regional center shall maintain a record of every developmentally disabled person under the age of 18 years known by the regional center to have been referred to it for its services, whether or not services are actually provided. 

(c) The state department shall transmit a copy of this section and of subdivision (a) of Section 4512 to every physician and surgeon licensed to practice in this state and every general acute care hospital licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. A list of the name and address of each regional center and such other pertinent information as the state department deems appropriate shall also be transmitted, both in English and Spanish.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to prevent any physician and surgeon subject to subdivision (a) from providing care or treatment to a developmentally disabled minor or to deprive developmentally disabled minors of adequate care provided through sources other than a regional center.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429) by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

4657.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall, through the regional center contract, require that the following information is collected by each regional center for each new case and is also collected at each review of all regional center clients in out-of-home placement.

Information shall include:

(a) The birthday of the parents of the client.

(b) The disability status of the parents of the client.

(c) Whether the parents of the client are deceased or
 not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (AB 445)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4658.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall insure that all potentially eligible clients are referred to the Social Security Administration for eligibility determination for Old Age Survivors Disability Insurance (OASDI).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1137, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) or (e), the regional center shall identify and pursue all possible sources of funding for consumers receiving regional center services. These sources shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) Governmental or other entities or programs required to provide or pay the cost of providing services, including Medi-Cal, Medicare, the Civilian Health and Medical Program for Uniform Services, school districts, and federal supplemental security income and the state supplementary program.

(2) Private entities, to the maximum extent they are liable for the
 cost of services, aid, insurance, or medical assistance to the consumer.

(b) Any revenues collected by a regional center pursuant to this section shall be applied against the cost of services prior to use of regional center funds for those services. This revenue shall not result in a reduction in the regional center’s purchase of services budget, except as it relates to federal supplemental security income and the state supplementary program.

(c) Effective July 1, 2009, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, regional centers shall not purchase any service that would otherwise be available from Medi-Cal, Medicare, the Civilian Health and Medical Program for Uniform Services, In-Home Support Services, California Children’s Services, private insurance, or a health care service plan when a consumer or a family meets the criteria of this coverage but chooses not to pursue that
 coverage. If, on July 1, 2009, a regional center is purchasing that service as part of a consumer’s individual program plan (IPP), the prohibition shall take effect on October 1, 2009.

(d) (1) Effective July 1, 2009, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not purchase medical or dental services for a consumer three years of age or older unless the regional center is provided with documentation of a Medi-Cal, private insurance, or a health care service plan denial and the regional center determines that an appeal by the consumer or family of the denial does not have merit. If, on July 1, 2009, a regional center is purchasing the service as part of a consumer’s IPP, this provision shall take effect on August 1, 2009. Regional centers may pay for medical or dental services during the following periods:

(A) While coverage is being
 pursued, but before a denial is made.

(B) Pending a final administrative decision on the administrative appeal if the family has provided to the regional center a verification that an administrative appeal is being pursued.

(C) Until the commencement of services by Medi-Cal, private insurance, or a health care service plan.

(2) When necessary, the consumer or family may receive assistance from the regional center, the Clients’ Rights Advocate funded by the department, or the state council in pursuing these appeals.

(e) This section shall not impose any additional liability on the parents of children with developmental disabilities, or to restrict eligibility for, or deny services to, any individual who qualifies for regional center services but is
 unable to pay.

(f) In order to best utilize generic resources, federally funded programs, and private insurance programs for individuals with developmental disabilities, the department and regional centers shall engage in the following activities:
